test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tubaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tubā: # Noun 19 'eng /est tuba/fin' - full paradigm
     tubā+N+Sg+Nom: tubā
     tubā+N+Sg+Gen: tubā
     tubā+N+Sg+Par: [tuʼbbõ, tubbõ]
     tubā+N+Sg+Dat: tubān
     tubā+N+Sg+Ins: tubāks
     tubā+N+Sg+Ill: [tuʼbbõ, tubbõ]
     tubā+N+Sg+Ela: tubāst
     tubā+N+Pl+Nom: tubād
     tubā+N+Pl+Gen: tubād
     tubā+N+Pl+Par: [tuʼbḑi, tubḑi]
     tubā+N+Pl+Dat: tubādõn
     tubā+N+Pl+Ins: tubādõks
     tubā+N+Pl+Ill: [tuʼbži, tubži]
     tubā+N+Pl+Ela: [tuʼbšti, tubšti]
